District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.14

Inactive status.

(a)

Upon application by any person licensed, certified, or registered to practice an occupation or profession in the District and payment of an inactive status fee established by the Mayor, the Mayor shall place such person on inactive status.

(b)

While on inactive status, the person shall not be subject to the renewal fee and shall not practice, attempt to practice, or offer to practice the occupation or profession in the District.

(c)

The Mayor shall issue a license or certificate or shall register any person who is on inactive status for less than 5 years and who desires to resume the practice of an occupation or profession for which that person was previously licensed, certified, or registered if that person:

(1)

Pays the fee established by the Mayor;

(2)

Complies with the continuing education requirements in effect at the time application is made for reactivation; and

(3)

Complies with all current requirements for renewal of licensing, certification, or registration.

(d)

If the person seeking return to active status has been on inactive status for 5 years or more, he or she shall be considered a new applicant and shall be required to meet all current requirements for licensure, unless the relevant board in its discretion determines that the failure to renew during the 5-year inactive period was due to reasonable cause or excusable neglect.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.14.